District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.13

Sale of pawn or pledge—Required time of possession.

No pawnbroker shall sell a pawn or a pledge until the pawn or the pledge has remained 6 months in the pawnbroker’s possession, unless by consent in writing by the pawner.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1042, ch. 970, § 13
Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-137,§ 2(a), 31 DCR 5743
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1913.
1973 Ed., § 2-2013.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.